Maryland, session 2025, HB1206.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Grant Program” means the Silver Spring Purple Line Construction
Zone Parking Improvement Grant Program.
(3) “Purple Line” means the light rail transit line between Bethesda in
Montgomery County and New Carrollton in Prince George’s County.
(b) (1) There is a Silver Spring Purple Line Construction Zone Parking
Improvement Grant Program.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1206*

HOUSE BILL 1206
(2) The purpose of the Grant Program is provide to funds to business
associations to improve parking in Downtown Silver Spring necessitated by the
construction of the Purple Line.
(3) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the Governor shall include in the annual
budget bill an appropriation of at least $50,000 to the Department of Transportation for
the Grant Program.
(c) (1) The Department of Transportation shall distribute funds appropriated
for the Grant Program to Montgomery County.
(2) Montgomery County shall implement a process to award grants to
business associations to be used to improve parking in Downtown Silver Spring.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at the end of June 30, 2027,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.